Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3412
Statement; filing.

A completed statement
as provided in subdivision (2)(a) of section 76-214 must be filed at the time
that the conveyance of real estate transferred by a transfer on death deed
becomes effective due to the death of the transferor or the death of a surviving
joint tenant of the transferor.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 12.